sv: Material för ljusrampshölje: ABS; Aluminium; Komposit; Plast; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Övrigt
hu: Fénysáv házának anyaga: ABS; Alumínium; Kompozit; Műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Egyéb
lt-LT: Šviesos juostos korpuso medžiaga: ABS; Aliuminis; Kompozitas; Plastikas; Nerūdijantis plienas; Plienas; Kita
tr: Işık çubuğu gövde malzemesi: ABS; Alüminyum; Kompozit; Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Diğer
de: Gehäusematerial der Lichtleiste: ABS; Aluminium; Verbundstoff; Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Stahl; Sonstige
fr: Matériau du boîtier de la barre lumineuse: ABS; Aluminium; Composite; Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Autre
zh-CN: 长条灯外壳材料: ABS; 铝材; 复合材料; 塑料; 不锈钢; 钢; 其他
nl: Lichtbalk behuizing materiaal: ABS; Aluminium; Composiet; Kunststof; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Overige
th: วัสดุตัวเรือนไฟแท่ง: ABS; อะลูมิเนียม; คอมโพสิต; พลาสติก; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał obudowy listwy świetlnej: ABS; Aluminium; Kompozyt; Plastik; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Inne
en: Light bar housing material: ABS; Aluminum; Composite; Plastic; Stainless steel; Steel; Other
it: Materiale della scocca della barra luminosa: ABS; Alluminio; Composito; Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Altro
ru: Материал корпуса световой балки: ABS; Алюминий; Композит; Пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Другое
ko: 라이트바 하우징 재질: ABS; 알루미늄; 복합재; 플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 기타
sl-SI: Material ohišja svetlobne palice: ABS; Aluminij; Kompozit; Plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Drugo
sk-SK: Materiál krytu svetelnej lišty: ABS; Hliník; Kompozit; Plast; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Iné
bg-BG: Материал на корпуса на светлинната лента: ABS; Алуминий; Композитен материал; Пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Друг
el: Υλικό περιβλήματος φωτεινής μπάρας: ABS; Αλουμίνιο; Σύνθετο υλικό; Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ατσάλι; Άλλο
nb: Lysstanghusets materiale: ABS; Aluminium; Kompositt; Plast; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Annet
hr-HR: Materijal kućišta svjetlosne trake: ABS; Aluminij; Kompozit; Plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Ostalo
cs: Materiál krytu světelné rampy: ABS; Hliník; Kompozit; Plast; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Jiné
ro-RO: Materialul carcasei barei luminoase: ABS; Aluminiu; Compozit; Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Altele
zh-TW: 燈條外殼材質: ABS; 鋁; 複合材質; 塑膠; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 其他
es: Material de la carcasa de la barra de luces: ABS; Aluminio; Material compuesto; Plástico; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Otro
pt-PT: Material da caixa da barra de luz: ABS; Alumínio; Composto; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Outro
ja: ライトバーハウジングの素材: ABS; アルミニウム; 複合材; プラスチック; ステンレス鋼; スチール; その他
fi: Valaisinkotelon materiaali: ABS; Alumiini; Komposiitti; Muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Muu
vi: Vật liệu vỏ đèn LED: ABS; Nhôm; Composite; Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Khác
pt-BR: Barra de luz material da carcaça: ABS; Alumínio; Composto; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Outro
da: Materiale i lygtebjælken: ABS; Aluminium; Komposit; Plastik; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Andet